Utah statutes.
32A-10-305 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Bond.
(1)  Any applicant for a temporary special event beer permit shall post a cash
or corporate surety bond in the penal sum of $500 payable to the department,
which the applicant has procured and must maintain for so long as the permit
is in effect.
(2)  The bond shall be in a form approved by the attorney general, conditioned
upon the permittee's faithful compliance with this title and the rules of the
commission.
(3) (a)  No part of any cash or corporate bond so posted may be withdrawn
during the period the permit is in effect.
(b)  A bond filed by the permittee may be forfeited if the permit is revoked.
